Tennessee, session 114, SB0664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-3-141(c), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting the following:
(c) If the only factor that disqualifies an applicant for an aquatic resource
alteration permit (ARAP) from having the activities for which a permit is sought covered
under a general permit is the size of the area that the permit will apply to, the department
shall exempt from compensatory mitigation an area equal in size to the area for which
mitigation would not be required if the permit applicant qualified for coverage under a
general permit.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0664
002542
- 1 -